Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 3. Manufactured Homes.

Cross references. —

For provisions on manufactured homes as real property, see AS

34.85.010

—

34.85.195

(Manufactured Home Property Act).

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 28.10.262.
Cancellation of manufacturer’s certificate of origin for manufactured home.

If a manufactured home is permanently affixed to real property under AS

34.85.150

, or if the owner intends to permanently affix the manufactured home to real property under AS

34.85.150

, the owner may submit to the department an application requesting that the department cancel the manufacturer’s certificate of origin for a manufactured home and update the department’s records under AS

28.05.061

.

The application under (a) of this section must comply with AS

28.10.266

.

Subject to AS

28.05.041

, if the department is satisfied that the application filed under (a) of this section complies with (b) of this section, the department shall cancel the manufacturer’s certificate of origin for the manufactured home, update the department’s records under AS

28.05.061

, and issue a written acknowledgment that the department has cancelled the certificate of origin under this section. The department shall deliver the written acknowledgment to the owner of the manufactured home and to a person identified under AS

28.10.266

(12).

When the department has cancelled the manufacturer’s certificate of origin under (c) of this section, the manufactured home is not subject to this chapter.

History.

(§ 16 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Sec. 28.10.263.
Cancellation of certificate of title to manufactured home.

If a manufactured home is permanently affixed to real property under AS

34.85.150

, or if the owner intends to permanently affix the manufactured home to real property under AS

34.85.150

, the owner may submit to the department an application requesting that the department cancel the certificate of title to a manufactured home and update the department’s records under AS

28.05.061

.

The application under (a) of this section must comply with AS

28.10.266

.

Subject to AS

28.05.041

, if the department is satisfied that the application filed under (a) of this section complies with (b) of this section and that there are no outstanding liens or encumbrances filed against the manufactured home under AS

28.10.381

, the department shall cancel the certificate of title to the manufactured home, update the department’s records under AS

28.05.061

, and issue a written acknowledgment that the department has cancelled the certificate of title under this section. The department shall deliver the written acknowledgment to the owner of the manufactured home and to a person identified under AS

28.10.266

(12).

When the department has cancelled a certificate of title under (c) of this section, the manufactured home is not subject to this chapter.

History.

(§ 16 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Sec. 28.10.264.
Confirmation of nonapplication of chapter.

The owner of a manufactured home may submit an application to the department requesting that the department indicate on the department’s records that the manufactured home is not subject to this chapter if

the manufactured home is permanently affixed to real property under AS

34.85.150

, or the owner intends to permanently affix the manufactured home to real property under AS

34.85.150

; and

the manufactured home

is not covered by a manufacturer’s certificate of origin or a certificate of title;

is covered by a manufacturer’s certificate of origin, but the owner of the manufactured home, after diligent search and inquiry, is unable to produce the certificate of origin; or

is covered by a certificate of title, but the owner of the manufactured home, after diligent search and inquiry, is unable to produce the certificate of title.

The application under (a) of this section must comply with AS

28.10.266

and be accompanied by a bond or cash deposit described in (c) of this section.

The bond that accompanies the application under (b) of this section must be in the form prescribed by the department and executed by the applicant. The amount of the bond or cash deposit that accompanies the application under (b) of this section must be equal to one and one-half times the value of the manufactured home as determined by the department and must be conditioned to indemnify former owners, secured parties, and subsequent purchasers of the manufactured home and their successors against loss resulting from a defect in or undisclosed security interest on the title of the applicant. An injured party may bring a court action against the bond or cash deposit for a breach of the conditions of the bond or cash deposit, but the liability of the bond surety or the department may not exceed the amount of the bond or cash deposit. The department shall return the bond or cash deposit at the end of three years after the submission under (b) of this section, except that service on the department of notice that an action is pending against the bond or cash deposit extends that period until 45 days after a final decision in the action on the bond or cash deposit.

If the department is satisfied that the application filed under (a) of this section complies with (b) of this section, the department shall, subject to AS

28.05.041

, indicate under AS

28.05.061

on the department’s records that the manufactured home is not subject to this chapter and shall provide to the owner a written confirmation that the owner of the manufactured home has submitted an application that complies with (b) of this section and that the manufactured home is not subject to this chapter. The department shall deliver the written confirmation to the owner of the manufactured home and to a person identified under AS

28.10.266

(12).

When the department has provided a written confirmation under (d) of this section, the manufactured home is not subject to this chapter.

History.

(§ 16 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Sec. 28.10.265.
Certificate of title to severed manufactured home.

The owner of a manufactured home may submit an application to the department requesting that the department issue a certificate of title to a manufactured home and update the department’s records under AS

28.05.061

if

the manufactured home was permanently affixed to real property under AS

34.85.150

;

an affixation affidavit was recorded for the manufactured home under AS

40.17.125

; and

after the occurrence of (1) and (2) of this subsection, the manufactured home was severed from the real property to which it was affixed.

The application under (a) of this section must comply with AS

28.10.266

.

Subject to AS

28.05.041

, if the department is satisfied that the application filed under (a) of this section complies with (b) of this section, the department shall issue a certificate of title to the manufactured home under AS

28.10.231

—

28.10.241

, update the department’s records under AS

28.05.061

, and issue to the owner and to a person identified under AS

28.10.266

(12) a written acknowledgment that the department has issued a certificate of title under this section.

When the department has issued a certificate of title under (c) of this section, the manufactured home is subject to this chapter.

History.

(§ 16 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Sec. 28.10.266.
Application provisions.

An application under AS

28.10.262

—

28.10.265

must provide

the name, residence, and mailing address of the owner of the manufactured home;

a description of the manufactured home, including the name of the manufacturer, the make, the model name, the model year, the manufacturer’s serial number for the manufactured home, and other information required by the department about the manufactured home;

whether the manufactured home is new or used;

for an application under AS

28.10.262

—

28.10.264

, the date of purchase by the owner of the manufactured home and the name and address of the person from whom the home was acquired;

for an application under AS

28.10.262

—

28.10.264

, the name and address of any person who holds a lien or an encumbrance against the manufactured home and the order of apparent priority;

a statement signed by the owner, stating

any facts or information known to the owner that could reasonably affect the validity of the title to the manufactured home or the existence or nonexistence of a lien or encumbrance on it; or

that the owner does not know any facts or information that could reasonably affect the validity of the title to the manufactured home or the existence or nonexistence of a lien or encumbrance on the manufactured home;

subject to AS

28.10.268

, for an application under AS

28.10.262

—

28.10.264

, a certified copy of an affixation affidavit that complies with AS

34.85.060

and that has been recorded under AS

40.17.125

for the manufactured home;

for an application under AS

28.10.265

, a certified copy of a severance affidavit that complies with AS

34.85.120

and that has been recorded under AS

40.17.125

for the manufactured home;

for an application under AS

28.10.262

, the original manufacturer’s certificate of origin;

for an application under AS

28.10.263

, the original certificate of title;

for an application under AS

28.10.264

or

28.10.265

, a declaration that complies with AS

28.10.267

;

if desired by the applicant, the name and mailing address of one person, in addition to the owner, to receive a written acknowledgment from the department under AS

28.10.262

,

28.10.263

, or

28.10.265

or a written confirmation under AS

28.10.264

; and

other information and documents the department reasonably requires

to identify the owner of the manufactured home;

to determine the existence or nonexistence of liens or encumbrances on the manufactured home;

for an application under AS

28.10.262

—

28.10.264

, to enable the department to determine whether the owner satisfied the applicable requirements of AS

34.85.010

; and

for an application under AS

28.10.265

, to enable the department to determine whether the owner of the manufactured home is entitled to a certificate of title.

History.

(§ 16 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Sec. 28.10.267.
Declaration.

The declaration required by AS

28.10.266

(11) must be made under oath or affirmation by an attorney authorized under AS 08.08 to practice law in the state or an agent of a title insurance company entitled under AS 21.66 to transact a title insurance business in this state.

The declaration must state that the manufactured home is free and clear of all liens and encumbrances and

any facts or information known to the attorney or agent that could reasonably affect the validity of the title to the manufactured home or the existence or nonexistence of a lien or encumbrance on the manufactured home; or

that the attorney or agent does not know any facts or information that could reasonably affect the validity of the title to the manufactured home or the existence or nonexistence of a lien or encumbrance on the manufactured home.

History.

(§ 16 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Sec. 28.10.268.
Time of satisfaction.

If a person delivers an application under AS

28.10.262

—

28.10.264

for a manufactured home to the department within 30 days after an affixation affidavit for the manufactured home is recorded under AS

40.17.125

, and if the application is accepted by the department, the requirements of AS

28.10.262

—

28.10.264

are considered to be satisfied on the date the affixation affidavit is recorded, and, if the manufactured home is conveyed or encumbered on and after that date, the manufactured home shall be conveyed and encumbered as real property.

History.

(§ 16 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Sec. 28.10.269.
Definitions.

In AS

28.10.201

—

28.10.269

, unless the context indicates otherwise,

“affixation affidavit” means an affixation affidavit under AS

34.85.060

;

“severance affidavit” means a severance affidavit under AS

34.85.120

.

History.

(§ 16 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Sec. 28.10.270.
Application. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]